Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5455YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2088 Section 1. Section 714.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 23. For the purpose of retaining or 3 obtaining employment, or any other thing of value, falsely 4 provides the employer or prospective employer with a social 5 security number that does not belong to that person. 6